Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 3. General Obligation Bonds.

Sec. 29.47.180.
General obligation bonds.

A municipality may acquire, construct, improve, and equip capital improvements and issue negotiable or nonnegotiable general obligation bonds for these purposes.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.190.
Vote and notice of existing indebtedness required.

A municipality may incur general obligation bond debt only after a bond authorization ordinance is approved by a majority vote at an election. Any municipal voter may vote in the bond election, except as otherwise provided by law.

Before a general obligation bond issue election, the governing body shall have published a notice of the total existing bond indebtedness at least once a week for three consecutive weeks. The first notice shall be published at least 20 days before the date of the election. A notice must include

the current total general obligation bonded indebtedness, including authorized but unsold bonds of the municipality;

the cost of the debt service on the current indebtedness;

the total assessed value of property in the municipality.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.200.
Payment.

The full faith and credit of a municipality are pledged for the payment of principal and interest on general obligation bonds. The municipality may levy ad valorem taxes for payment without limitation of rate or amount to pay or secure the payment of the principal and interest on bonds, regardless of whether the bonds are in default or in danger of default.

General obligation bonds issued for acquiring, constructing, improving, and equipping a municipally owned utility or other revenue-generating enterprise may be additionally secured by a pledge of the revenue derived from operation. Bonds so secured are not subject to a debt limitation imposed by a home rule charter. This subsection applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)